Florida, session 2026, HB1327.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (3) through (9) of section 402.33,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4) through
(10), respectively, and a new subsection (3) is added to that
section, to read:
402.33 Department authority to charge fees for services
provided.—
(3) The Department of Children and Families must receive,
deposit, and conserve all survivor benefit payments provided by
the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs on behalf of a
minor client in out-of-home care. The accumulated funds must be
disbursed in their entirety to the minor client upon attaining
18 years of age. The Department of Children and Families may not
use such funds to reimburse the state for the cost of care.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1327-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1327 2026
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1327-01-c1